Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.195

Powers of cities adopting charters.

Any city adopting a charter under Article XI, section 10 of the Constitution of the state of Washington, as amended by amendment 40, shall have all of the powers which are conferred upon incorporated cities and towns by Title 35 RCW, or other laws of the state, and all such powers as are usually exercised by municipal corporations of like character and degree.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 2. Formerly RCW 35.21.620.]

NOTES:

Legislative powers of charter city: RCW 35.22.200.